Virginia statutes. Title 37.2. Behavioral Health and Developmental Services.
Article 5. Disclosure of Patient Information to Third Party Payors by Professionals.

§§ 37.2-432 through 37.2-440.
Repealed by Acts 2005, cc. 43 and 111.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 716, recodified former §§ 37.1-225 through 37.1-233 as §§

37.2-432

through 37.2-440. Acts 2005, cc. 43 and 111, repealed former §§ 37.1-225 through 37.1-233. Pursuant to § 30-152, the repeal has been given effect in §§

37.2-432

et seq.